Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 6

Revocable Trusts

35-15-601. Capacity of settlor of revocable trust — Form of execution for post-death disposition.

The capacity required to create, amend, revoke, or add property to a revocable trust, or to direct the actions of the trustee of a revocable trust, is the same as that required to make a will. To be effective as a post death disposition of property transferred during the transferor's life or by the transferor's will to a trust of which the transferor is the settlor or deemed to be the settlor, neither a revocable nor irrevocable trust existing on or executed after July 1, 2004, has to be executed with the formalities of a will.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 47; 2005, ch. 99, § 8.

35-15-602. Revocation or amendment of revocable trust.

Unless the terms of a trust expressly provide that the trust is irrevocable, the settlor may revoke or amend the trust. This subsection (a) does not apply to a trust created under an instrument executed before July 1, 2004.

If a revocable trust is created or funded by more than one (1) settlor:

To the extent the trust consists of community property, the trust may be revoked by either spouse acting alone but may be amended only by joint action of both spouses;

To the extent the trust consists of property other than community property, each settlor may revoke or amend the trust with regard to the portion of the trust property attributable to that settlor's contribution; and

At the death of one (1) settlor, each surviving settlor shall have the right to revoke the trust as to that surviving settlor's portion of the trust as determined by the type of property in accordance with subdivisions (b)(1) and (b)(2).

The settlor may revoke or amend a revocable trust:

By substantial compliance with a method provided in the terms of the trust; or

If the terms of the trust do not provide a method or the method provided in the terms is not expressly made exclusive, by:

A later will or codicil that expressly refers to the trust or specifically devises property that would otherwise have passed according to the terms of the trust; or

Any other method manifesting clear and convincing evidence of the settlor's intent.

Upon revocation of a revocable trust, the trustee shall deliver the trust property as the settlor directs. However, with respect to community property under subdivision (b)(1), the trustee shall deliver the property one-half (½) to each spouse unless the governing instrument specifically states otherwise.

A settlor's powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property may be exercised by an agent under a power of attorney only to the extent expressly authorized by the terms of the trust or the power.

A conservator of the settlor or, if no conservator has been appointed, a guardian of the settlor may exercise a settlor's powers with respect to revocation, amendment, or distribution of trust property only if the trust instrument specifically grants to the conservator or guardian the power to revoke or amend the trust or distribute trust property.

A trustee who does not know that a trust has been revoked or amended is not liable to the settlor or settlor's successors in interest for distributions made and other actions taken on the assumption that the trust had not been amended or revoked.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 48.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Uniform Trust Code: New Formulation for a Trusty Tool (Marshall H. Peterson), 41 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 24 (2005).

35-15-603. Settlor's powers — Powers of withdrawal.

While a trust is revocable and the settlor has capacity to revoke the trust, rights of the beneficiaries are subject to the control of, and the duties of the trustee are owed exclusively to, the settlor.

If a revocable trust has more than one (1) settlor, the duties of the trustee are owed to all of the settlors having capacity to revoke the trust.

During the period the power may be exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal has the rights of a settlor of a revocable trust under this section to the extent of the property subject to the power.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 49.

35-15-604. Limitation on action contesting validity of revocable trust — Distribution of trust property.

A person may commence a judicial proceeding to contest the validity of a trust that was revocable immediately preceding the settlor's death within the earlier of:

Two (2) years after the settlor's death; or

One hundred twenty (120) days after the trustee sent the person a copy of the trust instrument and a notice informing the person of the trust's existence, of the trustee's name and address, and of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.

Upon the death of the settlor of a trust that was revocable immediately preceding the settlor's death, the trustee may proceed to distribute the trust property in accordance with the terms of the trust. The trustee is subject to liability for doing so if:

The trustee knows of a pending judicial proceeding contesting the validity of the trust; or

A potential contestant has notified the trustee of a possible judicial proceeding to contest the trust and a judicial proceeding is commenced within sixty (60) days after the contestant sent the notification.

A beneficiary of a trust that is determined by a court proceeding to be invalid is liable to return to the court any distribution received for proper distribution. If the beneficiary refuses to return the distribution after being ordered by the court, the beneficiary shall be liable for all costs incurred for recovery of the distribution.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 50.

35-15-605. Written statement or list to dispose of items of tangible personal property.

A revocable (living) trust that becomes irrevocable upon the death of its settlor may refer to a written statement or list to dispose of items of tangible personal property not otherwise specifically disposed of by the revocable trust, other than money, evidences of indebtedness, documents of title, securities, and property used in a trade or business.

To be effective under this section as evidence of the intended disposition, the writing:

Must:

Be either in the handwriting of the settlor or signed by the settlor;

Be dated; and

Describe the items and the beneficiaries with reasonable certainty;

May be prepared before or after the execution of the revocable trust;

May be altered by the settlor after its preparation, provided that the settlor signs and dates the alteration; and

May be a writing that has no significance apart from its effect upon the dispositions made by the revocable trust.

If more than one (1) otherwise effective writings exist or a single writing contains properly signed and dated alterations, the provisions of the most recent writing or alteration revoke any inconsistent provisions of all prior writings.

A trustee is not liable for any distribution of tangible personal property to the apparent beneficiary under the settlor's revocable trust without actual knowledge of the written statement or list, as described in subsection (a), and the trustee has no duty to recover property distributed without knowledge of the written statement or list.

Acts 2019, ch. 197, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 197, § 8. April 25, 2019.